Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $100,000,000 for the purposes  for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $400,000,000, to be allocated for the state’s response  to the COVID-19
pandemic public health emergency.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $100,000,000, to be allocated for the state’s wildfire recovery, prevention
and preparedness activities.
SECTION 4.
(1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $150,000,000, to provide distributions under
section 2, chapter , Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session) (Enrolled House Bill
4401).
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, to provide distributions under section 3,
chapter 
, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session) (Enrolled House Bill 4401).
SECTION 5. This 2020 third special session Act being necessary  for the immediate pres-
ervation of the public peace, health and  safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
2020 third special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5731 (SB 5731-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate December 21, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House December 21, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5731 (SB 5731-INTRO) Page 2